src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"%{p5%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p5%}:Cx <=>
               _ %{p4%}: %{p3%}: %{p2%}: %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cx Vow: Cns [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL1i1i13: ;
           where Cx in (kʷ b̓ ǰ n̓ m̓ p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕  y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!2019-03-04           where Cx in (p p̓ b t t̕ d dᶻ c c̓ č č̓ s š l l̕ ɬ ƛ̕ y w y̓ w̓ k k̓ k̓ʷ gʷ h xʷ q q̓ qʷ q̓ʷ x̌ x̌ʷ ʔ) ;
!! sčətxʷəd+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl bear
!!€ s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}čətxʷəd%^RedPL1i1i13
!!€ s%^√čičič0txʷəd0

!! liquids

"%{p1%}:l̕ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:l̕ <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [q|y] Vow: l [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: l̕ [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;

"%{p1%}:y̓ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:y̓ <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) q Vow: y [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: y̓ [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;



"%{p1%}:w̓ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:w̓ <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) q Vow: w [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: w̓ [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;

"%{p1%}:ʔ in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:ʔ <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) s Vow: q̓ʷ [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: ʔ [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
             %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns Vow: Cns: [ Lts | » ]* [%^Red1iq13:|%^Red1iq123:] ;

!! x̌aʔx̌aʔ+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg: **sacred/pyhä**
!!€ {p5}{p4}{p3}̌{p2}{p1}x̌aʔx̌aʔ^Red1iq123
!!€ 00x̌iqx̌aʔx̌aʔ0

"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [Cns - [q|y]] Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
  %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* %^Red12323: ;
           where Cx in (l) ;
!!€ %{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəlups%^RedPL123123
!!€ 00bəlbəlups0
	   
"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [Cns - q] Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
  %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* %^Red12323: ;
           where Cx in (y w) ;

"%{p1%}:Cx in reduplication"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{p1%}:Cx <=> %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) [Cns - s] Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* %^RedPL123123: ;
  %{p3%}: %{p2%}: _ (%{pØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cx [ Lts | » ]* %^Red12323: ;
           where Cx in (q̓ʷ) ;

"Cns:0 in reduplication 3 and 5"
!! **@RULENAME@**
CnsNoGlotOrD:0 <=> %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) _ Vow: Cns: [ Lts | » ]* %^Red12323: ;
!{p5}{p4}{p3}{p2}{p1}ʔaciɬtalbixʷ^Red12323
!00ʔac0aciɬtalbixʷ0


!"Disallow full vowel removal with Red1iq13 type of reduplication"
!!! **@RULENAME@**
!13:0 /<=
!  %{p1%}: (%{pØ%}:) Cns [a: | á: | à: | i: | í: | ì: | u: | ú: | ù:]  [ Lts | » ]* _ [ %> | # ]; ! full vowel not lost
!  where 13 in (%^RedPL1i1i13 %^Red1i13 %^Red12q13 %^Red1iq13 %^RedPL130130);
